New Jersey, session 222, A435.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1) The Department of Health, in conjunction with one or more licensed dentists and related staff, shall collect a sufficient number of random data samples from each county in the State on a biannual basis using the Basic Screening Survey produced by the Association of State and Territorial Dental Directors in order to formulate a general assessment of the oral health of pre-school and school aged children in this State. (2) No data shall be collected pursuant to this subsection without the informed, written consent of a childs parent or guardian. (3) Any data collected pursuant to this subsection shall be collected and used in a manner that is consistent with federal and State privacy laws. b.    The Department of Health shall submit a report biennially to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), which report shall contain any findings and recommendations based on the data collected pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.     The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.